North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-34 Duties and Liabilities of Trustees [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

30.1-34-01. (7-301)
General duties not limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-34-02. (7-302)
Trustee’s standard of care and performance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

Note.

S.L. 2007, ch. 549, section 10 purported to amend this section; however, section 27 of the same act repealed chapter 30.1-34 in its entirety and the amendment to this section is therefore ineffective.

30.1-34-03. (7-303)
Duty to inform and account to beneficiaries. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-34-04. (7-304)
Duty to provide bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-34-05. (7-305)
Trustee’s duties — Appropriate place of administration — Deviation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-34-06. (7-306)
Personal liability of trustee to third parties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-34-07. (7-307)
Limitations on proceedings against trustees after final account. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.